Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-130
Taxing official, defined.

Taxing official means any federal, state, or local government officer or employee who is charged with the duty of auditing, assessing, equalizing, levying, computing, and collecting taxes.

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 25.